languages/hyph-hu.tex
zí2jan
zí2je
zí2jö
zí2jü
zí2nac
zí2nad
zí2naku
zí2nal
zí2nan
zí2nas
zí2nat
zí2n1áll
zí2n1ár
zí2nát
zí2n1e2r
zí2nél
zí2ní
z1ínna
zín3nye
zíno2
zí2n1od
zí2n1ok
zí2nos
zí2n1ó2
zí2nö
zí2nu
zí2nú
z1í2ny
zínyenc1
zí2r1a
2z1í2rá
zí2rog
2z1í2ró
zítőa2
zítőe2
zítőkész1
zí2vaj
zív1akt
zí2val
zí2var
zí2ver
zí2v1ő
zí2vul
zí2vú
zí2ze
zí2zü
zí2zű
zje2gy1á2
z2k1abl
z2k1alak
z2k1alj
z2k1alt
zka1p2l
z2k1a2rád
z2k1a2ráj
z2k1a2rén
zkaró2
zka2rór
zka1s2k
z2k1állv
zk1bl
zk1dr
zk1egys
z2kenn
zk1eszk
z2k1etű
z2k1ér.
z2k1érté
z1k2hü
zkia2
zkiá2
zkie2
zki2g
z2k1igé
zki2sé
zk2la
z1k2lá
zk2ler
z1k2lí
zk2ló
z1k2lu
z2k1olda
zkon2t1ár
z2k1ontó
zko2r1os
z2k1oszl
z3koszt
z2kókor
zk1ókort
zkó2pá
zkó2z3s
zkö2zele
zköz1ell
zkö2z1é2l
zkőé2h
zk1pr
z1k2rak
zk2rá
z1k2reá
z1k2rém
z1k2réta
z1k2rétá
zk2rí
z1k2ro
z1k2rón
zkultú3
zkultúr2
z2k1u2rán
z2k1u2rát.
z2k1utá
z1k2val
zk2vó
zky2b
zky2h
zky2j
zky2k
zky2n
zky2r
zky2t
zky2v
zla2tal
zlata2n
zlat1any
zlá2m1e
zlá2mis
zlás3s
z2láv.
z2láve
z2lávé
z2lávk
z2lávn
z2lávo
z2lávv
zleg1g
zlei2
zleí2
z2leng.
zle2tak
zle2tal
zle2t1a2n
zle2tál
zle2t1á2r
zle2t1eg
zle2t1ell
zle2tesz
zle2tél
zle2t1ér.
zlet1érv
zle2tés
zle2t1é2té
zle2t1é2ve.
zletigaz1
zle2t1u
zle2tüz
zlé2sí
zlé2so
zlés3s
zlina2
zli2nan
zli2nin
z2loge
zlo2p1as
zlo2pó
zlóó2
zló2s1orr
zma1pr
zmas2
zma1sp
zmeá2
zme2ge
zme3gom
zmi2n1a2
zmi2n1e
zmuskész1
zmu2sö
zmu2s3z
zmu2tok
zna2pes
znie2
zni2ó
z2nob
znó1str
znót2
znó1tr
1zo
z1obj
z1o2dú
zo2es
z1o2ka.
z1o2k1a2d
z1o2kai
zo2k1ál
zoki2
zo2k1ip
z1o2k1ir
z1okke
z1okle
2z1o2koz
2zokta
zo2lab
2z1o2laj
zolajá2
zola2j1ár
zola2je
zo2l1a2l
zo2l1as
zol1ábr
zo2l1áro
z1oldal
2z1oldh
2z1oldó
zo2l1e
zol1f2
zol1inf
zo2l1is
zo2l1í
z1olló
zo2lö
z1oltás
z1oltó.
zol1t2re
zo2lü
2zolvad
zo2m1a2g
zo2mak
zo2m1a2l
zo2m1a2n
zo2map
zo2m1a2s
zom1áll
zo2m1á2r
zom1b2
3zombor.
2zome
zo2meg
zo2m1el
zo2men
2zomé
zo2mél
zomé2t
zo2m1éte
2zomf
2zomg
zomi2
zo2min
zo2miz
zom2jó
2zoml
zo2m1ors
zo2m1os
2zo2mö
2zom1p2
2zom1s
2zomz
zo2n1aj
zo2n1ak
zo2n1a2la
zo2n1alá
zo2n1alk
zona2n
zo2n1any
zo2n1a2r
zon1asz
zo2n1au
zo2náld
zo2n1áll
zo2n1átl
zone2
zo2neg
zo2nel
zo2n1er
zo2nes
zo2név
zo2nin
zo2n1i2o
zo2n1or
zono2sé
zo2n1ó2
zo2nö
zon1s2
zon2t1es
zon2tin
zon1tre
zo2nü
zo2ny1ad
zo2ny1a2l
zo2ny1a2n
zo2nyar
zo2nyav
zo2nye
zo2nyid
zo2nyij
zo2nyó
zo2ol
zo2om
z1opál
z1o2pe
zo1pho
zo2r1a2d
zo2raf
zo2r1ag
zo2r1aj
zo2r1a2l
zo2ran
zo2r1as
z1o2rat
zo2r1au
zo2r1e2
zor1f2
zo2rid
zo2r1il
zor1ing
z1ormá
zo2r1ol
zo2rop
zo2rosz
zo2r1ó2
zo2rö
z1orr.
z1orrú
z1orsó
zor1t2re
zo2rü
2z1osko
z1ostá
z1osto
zo1sz2f
z1oszl
zosz2tat
2zote
2zotó
zotó2pa
zo2vi
zo2xi
1zó
zóa2d
zóá2g
zóá2r
zó1bl
zó1b2r
zó1cl
zó2d1e2l
zó1fl
zó1f2r
zó1gl
zógyö2k1ér
zói2g
zóí2v
zója1
zó1k2l
zó1kré
zókupac1
2zól.
z1ólm
zó2lomb
3zónád
3zónái
z1ó2ni
2z1ónj
2z1ónn
z1ó2nod
2z1ónt
zóó2r
zó1p2l
zó1p2r
z1ó2rad
z1ó2rar
zó2rasz
zó2rái
z1ó2ráj
z1ó2rák
z1ó2rár
zórás1s
z1ó2rát
z1ó2ráv
z1ó2riá
zós1ík.
zó2s1ín.
zó1s2ká
zó1sl
zó1s2ta
zó1sté
zósz1akad
zósz1állí
zó2szene
zó2sz1é2le
zó2sz1íj
zósz1ü2lő.
zóta2g1a2
zóté2g
zót1ége
zó1tré
z1ó2vó
1zö
zö2bá
zö2bo
zö2bó
z1öcc
zö2dé
zö2dú
zö2ga
zö2gá
zög3g
zö2gil
zö2gí
zö2go
zögö2
zö2g1öl
zö2gu
zö2gy
2z1ökl
2z1ö2ko
2zökrü
3zöldes
3zölds
2zöleb
zö2les
2z1ölniv
z1ölyv
2z1öml
z1ö2na
z1ö2ná
2zönb
2zöne
2zöné
2zöni
2zönl
2zönne
2zönö
2zönr
2zönt
3zörej
zör2f1e
zör2f1o
zör2nya
zör2nyá
zör2nyel
zör2nyesz
zör2nyék
zör2nyí
zö2rök
zör2p1a2
zör2pá
2z1örv
2zössz
z1ösv
z1ösztö
zö2te
2z1ötl
2z1ötv
z1öv.
z1ö2vei
z1ö2vek
zöve2t1e2l
z1ö2vez
zö2zö
1ző
zőa2c
zőa2l
zőá2g
ző1bl
ző1br
zőé2l
ző1fl
ző1f2r
zőgépi2
zőgé2p1ip
ző1gr
ző1kl
zőmű1
zőnyá2
ző2ny1er
ző2ny1é2k
ző2nyért
ző1pl
ző1pr
ző2ran
ző2r1e2c
ző2r1ege
ző2rel
ző2r1er
2zőrk
2zőrl
z1őrlő
2zőrm
ző2rol
2zőrü
ző2r1ü2g
2zőrz
z1őrzé
z1őrző
ző2sis
ző1ská
ző1spe
ző1s2pi
ző1sta
ző1sti
ző1str
zősz2
ző1szf
ző1szt
ző1tr
zőü2l
zpen1n
zp2fe
zp2la
zp2lé
zp2lo
zpor2t1e2
zpor2t1ő2
zpor2t1ú
z1p2ra
z1p2ri
z1p2ro
z1p2ru
zrae3le
zrádiói2t
zre2d1á2
zre2del
zre2d1é2k
zre2d3z
zren2d1ő2
3z2rí.
z2s
1zsa
zs1abla
2zs1a2dat
2zs1a2dó
zsag2
2zsah.
2zsajt
2zs1akc
2zs1alj
2zs1alm
2zs1alt
zsa2nyá
zsa2pa.
2z3sapk
zsa2rán
z3sarj
2z3sark
2z3sarl
2zs1arz
2zs1aszt
zs1atl
zsa1tr
2zs1a2ty
2zsautó.
2zsautón
zs1azo
1zsá
2zs1ábr
2z3sáf
2z3ság
zs1ággy
zsá2kó
2zs1ála
2zsálc
2zsálm
2zs1á2p
2zs1á2rak
2zsárat
2z3sári
2zsáru
2zsáte
2zs1átk
2zsáto
2zsátö
2zs1áts
2zs1á2zós
zs1bl
zs1br
z3s2ch
zscsapá2
zsde1s
zs1dr
1zse
zse2ba
zse2biro
zse2b1o2
2zsebz
zs1e2ce
zs1e2dé
z3sej
2zsell
zs1elm
2zselö
zs1e2lőf
zs1e2lőr
2zsember
2zs1e2mel
zs1enc
zs1ene
zse2raj
zse2r1á2
zse2rel
zsere2s
zse2r1esz
zse2r1ék
zse2rin
zse2r1o
2zsese
zse2szü
zs1evé
2zs1ex
2zsez
1zsé
z3ség
zsé2ge2l
2zséhs
2zsél
zs1éle
2zsép
2zs1érd
2zs1érte
2zs1érté
3zséry
2zsérz
2zséte
2zs1étk
2zs1étr
2zs1étt
2zs1é2ve.
zs1fl
zs1fr
zs1gr
1zsi
2zsidő
2zsigá
2zsigé
zsi2kor
2zs1ill
2zs1i2má
zsi2min
zsi2m1u
2zsinas
zs1i2pa
z3sipk
2zsirat
zs1irato
2zs1iro
2zs1irt
2zs1ism
2zsist
zsi2tat
2zsivó
zs1izé
2zs1izm
2zs1i2zo
zs1izz
1zsí
2z3síb
zs1íj
2z3sík
2z3síp
zsí2r1a2
zsí2rá2
3zsírbó
3zsíré
3zsíros
3zsírr
3zsírt2
2zs1í2v
2zs1í2z
zs1kl
zs1k2r
1zso
2z3sof
2zs1okm
2zs1okta
2zsolaj
zs1oli
3zsom
2zs1op
2zsor
z3soro
2zsosty
2zs1osz
1zsó
zs1óné
zs1órá
1zsö
2zsökör
2zsölőz
2zs1ös
zs1ö2ve
1zső
zs2pir
zs1p2l
zsp2r
zs1s2k
zs1s2p
zs1st
zs3sz
zssze2r1e2l
z3s2tad
z3s2tat
z3s2top
zst2r
zs1tro
z3s2tú
1zsu
2zs1ud
2zsugár.
2zsugárr
2zsugr
3zsul
2zsum
zsu1s
zsusz2
1zsú
2zs1új
2zsúl
zsú2r1a
1zsü
2zsüg
2zsült
2zsünn
zs1üs
2zsüt
2zs1üz
1zsű
zs1wh
zs3zac
z3szag
zsza2ké
zsza2k1ü
z3szav
zs3záp
zs3zás
z3szem
zs3zené
z3szer
z3szé
zsz2f
z3szi
zszind2
z3szí
z3sz2k
zsz2l
z3szo
z3szó
z3szö
zsz2p
zs3zs
zsz2t2
z3szü
z3szű
zt1abla
z2t1a2bor
z2t1a2cé
z2ta2dal
zt1a2dat
zt1a2dó
z2t1agre
z2t1a2ká
z2t1akc
z2t1akk
zt1akn
ztaköz1
z2t1akv
zt1a2lapú
ztale2l
zta2lele
z2t1anal
ztan2e
zt1anes
zt1anké
zta2n1ó2
zt1a2nyag
zt1anyak
zt1anyas
zt1anyád
zt1anyám
zt1anyáu
z2t1anyu
zt1a2pán
zt1a2pás
zt1a2pát
z2t1apó
zt1app
z2t1aps
zt1a2puk
z2t1a2ra.
zt1arán
z2t1arc
ztaso2
zta1sp
zt1assz
z2taszt
zt1aszta
z2tatig
z2t1atk
z2t1aty
z2t1a2ut
zt1ábr
ztá2cs
zt1ácso
zt1ág.
z2t1á2ga
z2táli
z2t1álm
ztá2raj
ztá2r1ass
zt1árem
ztá2ris
z2t1árnö
zt1árnya
z2tároc
z2tárokk
ztá2r1olt
ztá2r1óra
ztár1sm
ztár1s2p
ztárt2
zt1árví
ztá2sz
zt1ászo
zt1ászt
z2t1átha
z2t1áts
z2t1átv
ztávi2
ztá2v1ir
zt1bl
zt1dr
z2t1e2b
z2t1ef
z2t1e2gé
z2t1egy
z2t1e2ke.
z2t1e2kés
z2t1ela
z2t1elá
z2t1elb
z2t1e2legy
z2t1e2leme
z2t1e2lemm
z2telemz
z2t1elf
z2t1eljá
z2t1ellát
z2t1elm
z2telnö
z2t1e2lo
zt1e2lőadá
z2t1e2lőc
z2t1elr
z2t1eltá
z2t1elto
z2t1ember
z2t1e2mel
z2t1eml
z2tent
zt1ente
zte2raj
zte2rak
zte2rál
zte2rár
z2terde
ztere2ot
zte2repo
zte2rill
zte2ris
zte2riz
zte2rosz
z2t1e2rot
z2t1e2ró
z2t1erő
zte2r1ü2lé
zte2sz
z2t1esze
z2t1eszé
z2t1eszk
z2t1ezr
zt1ég.
zt1égb
zt1é2gé
zt1égr
z2t1é2j
zté2k1e2l
z2t1ékné
z2t1é2le
z2télé
zt1é2lés
z2t1élm
z2t1é2lő
z2t1élt
zt1élű
z2t1épü
zté2rá
z2t1érd
z2t1érl
z2t1érté
z2t1érz
zté2sz
z2t1észh
z2t1észn
zté2tét
z2t1étk
zt1é2ves.
zt1évt
zt1fl
zt1fr
zt1gr
z1t2hen
ztia2g
zt1i2den
z2t1idé
z2tidi
z2t1ifj
z2t1i2gé
z2t1i2kon
z2t1ille
z2timá
z2t1imp
z2t1ind
z2tinfe
z2t1info
z2t1ing.
z2t1ingá
z2t1ingb
z2t1inge
z2t1ingé
z2t1ingg
z2tingu
z2t1inte
z2t1inté
z2t1invá
zti2p
z2t1ipa
z2t1irá
z2t1isk
z2t1ism
z2t1istá
z2t1iste
z2tital
z2t1i2tat
z2t1íj
z2t1í2r
zt1í2veke
zt1kl
zt1kr
zt1kv
z2toi
z2t1o2koz
z2t1oltó
zto2lyag
zt1ope
zto2ras
zto2r1e
z2t1orgi
ztorkész1
zt1ornam
z2torrú
z2torvo
z2t1oszl
zt1osztá
ztóá2
ztóigaz1
z2t1ó2ni
ztó1p2
ztó1sp
ztó1tr
zt1öko
ztö2l
z2t1öle
ztön3n
ztö2röks
z2t1öss
zt1ö2vez
zt1övig
z2t1öz
ztőa2
ztőe2l
ztőé2b
z2t1őrh
zt1őrl
z2t1őrs
zt1ő2sei
z2t1ő2sö
zt1ősű
zt1pl
zt1pr
zt1ps
z1tranz
zt2rádá
z1t2rág
z1tréf
z1t2rén
z1trikó
z1tril
z1t2rió
z1t2rü
zt1sl
zt1sn
zt1sp
zt1st
zt1sz
zt1t2r
z2t1udv
z2t1ug
z2t1ura
z2t1uru
ztus3s
zt1u2tat
z2t1utu
z2t1új
z2t1úr.
z2t1úrb
z2t1ú2ré
z2t1úrh
z2t1ú2ri
z2t1úrk
z2t1úrn
z2t1ú2ro
z2t1úrr
z2t1úrt
z2t1üg
ztü2lé
z2t1ülés
ztül1l
z2t1üt
z2t1ü2v
zt1ü2zem
z2t1űr.
z2t1ű2ri
z2tye
1zu
zu2b1a
3zubb
zu2b1i
zu2bu
zu2c3s
3zug.
zu2gag
zu2gap
zu2gáru
zu2g1ás
3zugb
zu2g1e2
zu2gé
zu2gin
zu2git
zu2giv
zu2gí
3zugo
zu2g1or
zu2gö
zu2gü
zu2gű
3zuha
zule2
zu2lel
zu2l1enc
zu2l1es
zuli2ná
zu2lú
zulya2
zu2ly1ag
zu2mab
zu2m1a2d
zu2maj
zu2mal
zu2mar
zu2m1as
zume2
zumegyez1
zu2mel
zu2m1en
zu2mél
zu2m1é2n
zu2m1id
zu2m1in
zu2m1i2p
zu2mí
zumkész1
zu2mol
zu2mő
zu2mur
zu2mü
2zund
z1undo
zu2ne
zu2n1é
2zuni
zu2n1ö2
zu2ral
zu2ram
zurat2
2z1urn
zu2rú
zu2sad
zus1aka
zu2sal
zusa2n
zus1any
zu2sas
zu2s1ág
zu2s1e2
zu2s1érté
zu2sis
zu2s1í
zuskész1
zu2s1ol
zu2s1ó2
zu2ső
zuss2
zussz2
zus3sze
zus3szi
zust2
zus1tr
zu2s1ü2
zu2sz1i2k
zu2szon
zu2s3zó
2z1u2ta
z1u2tá
2z1utc
zu2tol
zu2tó.
zu2tób
zu2tói
zu2tój
zu2tón
z1u2tu
1zú
zú1dr
zú1fl
3zúgá
z1újd
z1ú2jé
z1ú2jí
z1újs
zú2r1e2
zúré2t
z1ú2szás
zú2té.
z1ú2tér
z1úth
z1úti
zú2ti.
zú2tiak.
3z2útiaka
zú2tiakr
zú2tib
zú2tig
zú2tih
zú2tin
zú2tiv
z1ú2tí
z1útj
z1útn
z1ú2ton
z1útró
z1útt
zú2tü
z1útv
3zúzá
3zúzd
3zúzó
1zü
zü2dü
zügy1és
z1ügyk
z1üldö
z1ü2lep
z1ü2lőseb
z1ü2lőset
zü2ni
2zünn
zü2rí
z1ü2rü
z1ü2te
z1ü2té
z1ütk
z1ü2tő
zü2ve
zü2vö
zü2zen
z1üzl
1zű
zű2csa
zű2csá
zű2csip
zű2cs1o
zű2ra
zű2rá
zűrés3s
zű2r1i2z
z1űrla
zű2ró
zű2ru
zű2z1a2
zű2z1á
zű2ze
zűzé2r
zű2z1ére
zű2zo
z1ű2ző
zű2zs
zű2zú
zva2su
zvárosé2
zváro2s1om
zve2gya
zvé2nyel
z2vit.
zvi2tác
z2vitj
zy1ak
z1yar
zy2be
zy2je
zy2ne
zy2né
zy2re
zy2rő
zy2sa
zy2so
zy2tő
zy2ve
z2z1áll
zzá2r1ó2r
zzát2
zzá1tr
zzi2n1é2
zz2le
zz1ly
z2zs
z3zsák
z3zsám
z3zsi
z3zsí
z3zso
}
